Colorado, session 2026A, HB1062.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 39-22-104, amend
(4)(f)(I), (4)(f)(III)(A), and (4)(f)(III)(B); repeal (4)(f)(III)(C) and
(4)(f)(III)(D); and add (4)(f)(IV), (4)(f)(V), and (4)(f)(VI) as follows:
39-22-104. Income tax imposed on individuals, estates, and
trusts - single rate - report - tax preference performance statement
- legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(4) There shall be subtracted from federal taxable income:
(f) (I) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION (4)(f), for
income tax years commencing on or after January 1, 1989, amounts
received as pensions or annuities from any source by any individual who
is fifty-five years of age or older at the close of the taxable year, to the
extent included in federal adjusted gross income;
(III) (A) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING PRIOR TO
JANUARY 1, 2027, amounts subtracted under this subsection (4)(f) are
-2- HB26-1062

capped at twenty thousand dollars per tax year for any individual who is
fifty-five years of age or older but less than sixty-five years of age at the
close of the taxable year. For income tax years commencing on or after
January 1, 2025, the cap set forth in this subsection (4)(f)(III)(A) is
calculated by first considering the total amount of social security benefits
a taxpayer received that were included in federal taxable income at the
close of the taxable year. If the total amount of such social security
benefits exceeds the cap set forth in this subsection (4)(f)(III)(A), and the
taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the applicable tax year is less than
or equal to seventy-five thousand dollars if filing individually or
ninety-five thousand dollars if filing jointly, then the cap is increased to
an amount equal to the total amount of such social security benefits.
(B) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING PRIOR TO JANUARY 1,
2027, amounts subtracted under this subsection (4)(f) are capped at
twenty-four thousand dollars per tax year for any individual who is
sixty-five years of age or older at the close of the taxable year. For
income tax years commencing on or after January 1, 2022, the cap set
forth in this subsection (4)(f)(III)(B) is calculated by first considering the
total amount of social security benefits a taxpayer received that were
included in federal taxable income at the close of the taxable year. If the
total amount of such social security benefits exceeds the cap set forth in
this subsection (4)(f)(III)(B), then the cap is increased to an amount equal
to the total amount of such social security benefits.
(C) For the purpose of determining the subtraction allowed by this
subsection (4)(f), in the case of a joint return, social security benefits
included in federal taxable income shall be apportioned in a ratio of the
gross social security benefits of each taxpayer to the total gross social
-3- HB26-1062

security benefits of both taxpayers.
(D) As used in this subsection (4)(f), "pensions and annuities"
means retirement benefits that are periodic payments attributable to
personal services performed by an individual prior to his or her retirement
from employment and that arise from an employer-employee relationship,
from service in the uniformed services of the United States, or from
contributions to a retirement plan that are deductible for federal income
tax purposes. "Pensions and annuities" includes distributions from
individual retirement arrangements and self-employed retirement
accounts to the extent that such distributions are not deemed to be
premature distributions for federal income tax purposes, amounts
received from fully matured privately purchased annuities, social security
benefits, and amounts paid from any such sources by reason of permanent
disability or death of the person entitled to receive the benefits.
(IV) (A) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2027, ALL AMOUNTS RECEIVED AS PENSIONS OR ANNUITIES
FROM ANY SOURCE BY ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO IS FIFTY-FIVE YEARS OLD OR
OLDER AT THE CLOSE OF THE TAXABLE YEAR, TO THE EXTENT INCLUDED
IN FEDERAL ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME;
(B) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-21-304 (1), WHICH
REQUIRES EACH BILL THAT CREATES A NEW TAX EXPENDITURE TO INCLUDE
A TAX PREFERENCE PERFORMANCE STATEMENT AS PART OF A STATUTORY
LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND
DECLARES THAT THE GENERAL PURPOSE OF THE TAX EXPENDITURES
CREATED IN THIS SUBSECTION (4)(f)(IV) IS TO PROVIDE TAX RELIEF FOR
CERTAIN INDIVIDUALS AND THAT THE SPECIFIC PURPOSE OF THE TAX
EXPENDITURES IS TO PROVIDE SUCH TAX RELIEF TO INDIVIDUALS WHO
-4- HB26-1062

RECEIVE PENSION OR ANNUITY BENEFITS. THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND
THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL MEASURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE
EXEMPTION ALLOWED BY THIS SECTION BASED ON THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
PENSION AND ANNUITY BENEFITS THAT INDIVIDUALS SUBTRACT FROM
THEIR FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME WHEN CALCULATING THEIR STATE
TAXABLE INCOME. THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE STATE AUDITOR, SHALL COLLECT THE INFORMATION NECESSARY
FOR THE STATE AUDITOR TO MEASURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE INCOME
TAX SUBTRACTION ALLOWED BY THIS SUBSECTION (4)(f)(IV) BASED ON
THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF PENSION OR ANNUITY BENEFITS THAT INDIVIDUALS
SUBTRACT FROM THEIR FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME WHEN CALCULATING
THEIR STATE TAXABLE INCOME.
(V) FOR THE PURPOSE OF DETERMINING THE SUBTRACTION
ALLOWED BY THIS SUBSECTION (4)(f), IN THE CASE OF A JOINT RETURN,
SOCIAL SECURITY BENEFITS INCLUDED IN FEDERAL TAXABLE INCOME
SHALL BE APPORTIONED IN A RATIO OF THE GROSS SOCIAL SECURITY
BENEFITS OF EACH TAXPAYER TO THE TOTAL GROSS SOCIAL SECURITY
BENEFITS OF BOTH TAXPAYERS.
(VI) AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (4)(f), "PENSIONS AND
ANNUITIES" MEANS RETIREMENT BENEFITS THAT ARE PERIODIC PAYMENTS
ATTRIBUTABLE TO PERSONAL SERVICES PERFORMED BY AN INDIVIDUAL
PRIOR TO THE INDIVIDUAL'S RETIREMENT FROM EMPLOYMENT AND THAT
ARISE FROM AN EMPLOYER-EMPLOYEE RELATIONSHIP, FROM SERVICE IN
THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OF THE UNITED STATES, OR FROM
CONTRIBUTIONS TO A RETIREMENT PLAN THAT ARE DEDUCTIBLE FOR
FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES. "PENSIONS AND ANNUITIES" INCLUDES
DISTRIBUTIONS FROM INDIVIDUAL RETIREMENT ARRANGEMENTS AND
-5- HB26-1062

SELF-EMPLOYED RETIREMENT ACCOUNTS TO THE EXTENT THAT SUCH
DISTRIBUTIONS ARE NOT DEEMED TO BE PREMATURE DISTRIBUTIONS FOR
FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES, AMOUNTS RECEIVED FROM FULLY
MATURED PRIVATELY PURCHASED ANNUITIES, SOCIAL SECURITY BENEFITS,
AND AMOUNTS PAID FROM ANY SUCH SOURCES BY REASON OF PERMANENT
DISABILITY OR DEATH OF THE PERSON ENTITLED TO RECEIVE THE BENEFITS.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-6- HB26-1062